Washington statutes.
RCW 19.16.150

Branch office certificate required.

If a licensee maintains a branch office, he, she, or it shall not operate a collection agency business in such branch office until he, she, or it has secured a branch office certificate therefor from the director. A licensee, so long as his, her, or its license is in full force and effect and in good standing, shall be entitled to branch office certificates for any branch office operated by such licensee upon payment of the fee therefor provided in this chapter.

Each licensee when applying for a branch office certificate shall pay a fee determined by the director as provided in RCW 43.24.086. An annual fee determined by the director as provided in RCW 43.24.086 for a branch office certificate shall be paid to the director on or before January first of each year. If the annual fee is not paid on or before January first, a penalty for late payment in an amount determined by the director as provided in RCW 43.24.086 shall be assessed. If the fee and the penalty are not paid by January thirty-first, it will be necessary for the licensee to apply for a new branch office certificate: PROVIDED, That no such new branch office certificate shall be issued unless and until all fees and penalties previously accrued under this section have been paid.

[ 2011 c 336 s 510; 1985 c 7 s 82; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 91; 1971 ex.s. c 253 s 6.]